Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1351
Construction contracts; bidders; qualifications; evaluation by department; powers of department.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person desiring to submit to the department a bid for the performance of any contract for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances, which the department proposes to let, shall apply to the department for prequalification. Such application shall be made not later than five days before the letting of the contract unless fewer than five days is specified by the department. The department shall determine the extent of any applicant's qualifications by a full and appropriate evaluation of the applicant's experience, bonding capacity as determined by a bonding agency licensed to do business in the State of Nebraska or other sufficient financial showing deemed satisfactory by the department, and performance record. In determining the qualification of an applicant to bid on any particular contract, the department shall consider the resources available for the particular contract contemplated.

(2) The department may, in its sole discretion, grant an exemption from all prequalification requirements for any contract for:

(a) The construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances if the estimate of the department for such work is two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less;

(b) The construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances if such work is of an emergency nature;

(c) Turf maintenance or vegetation control, including mowing, weed spraying, weed maintenance, tree trimming, tree removal, and tree maintenance;

(d) Fence installation, repair, or maintenance;

(e) Ditch cleaning or erosion control;

(f) Culvert repair or maintenance, including relining, cleanout, and other structural repairs or maintenance;

(g) Any device for an intelligent transportation system, any other technological device, or the repair or maintenance of any such type of device;

(h) Repair or maintenance of any rest area or weigh station; or

(i) Any repair or maintenance relating to any road, bridge, or appurtenance of any road or bridge, if such repair or maintenance is of a routine nature.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 51, p. 439;

Laws 1973, LB 491, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB312, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB117, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 49.
July 18, 2026